Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-240.11
Improvements and growing crops of lessee; list; acknowledgment in writing; dispute; proceedings.

The board shall determine what improvements and growing crops are on the land and develop a specific listing and detailed description of permitted and nonpermitted improvements owned by the lessee and by the State of Nebraska. Only those permitted improvements owned by the lessee shall be considered in determining the value of the lessee's interest therein. The listing of permitted improvements and growing crops shall be acknowledged and agreed upon in writing by both parties. In the event of a dispute regarding ownership of any improvements, either the board or the lessee may file an action in district court for a declaratory judgment.

Laws 1967, c. 467, § 2, p. 1452;

Laws 1971, LB 413, § 3.

Ownership of improvements on school lands determined pursuant hereto. State v. Rosenberger, 187 Neb. 726, 193 N.W.2d 769 (1972).